Washington statutes.
RCW 3.30.015

Construction of "justices of the peace," "justice courts," "justice of the peace courts."

All references to justices of the peace in other titles of the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed as meaning district judges. All references to justice courts or justice of the peace courts in other titles of the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed as meaning district courts.

[ 1984 c 258 s 90.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.